fr: Maison et jardin > Décorations > Accessoires pour drapeaux et manches à air: Embouts pour drapeaux et manches à air; Drisses et cordages pour drapeaux et manches à air; Éclairages de mâts pour drapeaux et manches à air; Kits ou pièces de montage de mâts pour drapeaux et manches à air; Mâts pour drapeaux et manches à air
pl: Dom i ogród > Ozdoby > Akcesoria do flag i wiatrowskazów: Nasadki dekoracyjne do flag i wiatrowskazów; Liny i fały do flag i wiatrowskazów; Oświetlenie flag i wiatrowskazów; Osprzęt i zestawy do montażu flag i wiatrowskazów na maszcie; Maszty do flag i wiatrowskazów
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Διακόσμηση > Αξεσουάρ για σημαίες & ανεμούρια: Ακροκέραμα σημαιών & ανεμούριων; Σχοινιά και ανυψωτικά για σημαίες & ανεμούρια; Φώτα κονταριών για σημαίες & ανεμούρια; Εξαρτήματα & κιτ στερέωσης για κοντάρια σημαίας & ανεμούρια; Κοντάρια για σημαίες & ανεμούρια
en: Home & Garden > Decor > Flag & Windsock Accessories: Flag & Windsock Finials; Flag & Windsock Halyards & Ropes; Flag & Windsock Pole Lights; Flag & Windsock Pole Mounting Hardware & Kits; Flag & Windsock Poles
hu: Otthon és kert > Dekoráció > Zászló- és szélzsákosrúd-kiegészítők: Zászló- és szélzsák-kiegészítők; Zászló- és szélzsák kötelek és felvonókötelek; Zászló- és szélzsákosrúd-világítások; Zászló- és szélzsákosrúd-rögzítő hardverek és készletek; Zászló és szélzsákos rudak
nl: Huis en tuin > Decoratie > Accessoires voor vlaggen en windzakken: Vlaggen en windzakken; Vlaggen- en windzaklijnen; Verlichting voor vlaggen- en windzakmasten; Montagemateriaal en kits voor vlaggen en windzakken; Vlaggen- en windzakmasten
nb: Hjem og hage > Dekor > Tilbehør til flagg og vindsokker: Endestykker til flagg og vindsokker; Flagg- og vindsokkfall og tau; Lys til flagg- og vindsokkstenger; Monteringsmateriell og sett for flagg- og vindsokkstenger; Flagg- og vindsokkstenger
es: Casa y jardín > Decoración > Accesorios para banderas y mangas de viento: Terminales para banderas y mangas de viento; Drizas y cuerdas para banderas y mangas de viento; Luces para mástiles de banderas y mangas de viento; Kits y herramientas para montar conos de viento y banderas; Mástiles de banderas y mangas de viento
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dekoracija > Dodatki za zastave in vetrne vreče: Zastavice in vetrne vreče; Vrvi in kompleti za dviganje in spuščanje zastav in vetrnih vreč; Luči za drogove za zastave in vetrne vreče; Okovje in kompleti za pritrditev drogov za zastave in vetrne vreče; Drogovi za zastave in vetrne vreče
it: Casa e giardino > Arredo > Accessori per bandiere e maniche a vento: Terminali per bandiere e maniche a vento; Drizze e cime per bandiere e maniche a vento; Luci per aste di bandiere e maniche a vento; Kit e accessori per il montaggio di aste per bandiere e maniche a vento; Aste per bandiere e maniche a vento
ru: Дом и сад > Декор > Аксессуары для флагов и ветроуказателей: Наконечники для флагов и ветроуказателей; Фалы и канаты для флагов и ветроуказателей; Подсветка для флагов и ветроуказателей; Комплекты для установки флагов и ветроуказателей; Шесты для флагов и ветроуказателей
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 실내 장식 > 깃발/풍향계 부대용품: 깃발 및 윈드삭 피니얼; 깃발 및 풍향계 로프; 깃발/풍향계 기둥 조명; 깃발/풍향계 설치 장비/키트; 깃발/풍향계 기둥
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Dekor > Bayrak ve Rüzgar Tulumu Aksesuarları: Bayrak ve Rüzgâr Tulumu Tepelikleri; Bayrak ve Rüzgâr Tulumu Halatları; Bayrak ve Rüzgar Tulumu Direk Lambaları; Bayrak ve Rüzgar Tulumu Direği Montaj Donanımı ve Setleri; Bayrak ve Rüzgar Tulumu Direkleri
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 装饰 > 旗帜/风向旗配件: 旗帜和风向袋顶饰; 旗帜/风向旗旗绳和绳索; 旗帜/风向旗杆灯; 旗帜/风向袋安装硬件与套装; 旗帜/风向旗杆
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Dekoracije > Dodaci za zastave i vjetrokaze: Završeci za zastave i vjetrokaze; Čelično uže i konopi za zastave i vjetrokaze; Svjetla za stupove zastava i vjetrokaza; Pribor i kompleti za montažu stupova za zastave i vjetrokaze; Stupovi za zastave i vjetrokaze
de: Heim & Garten > Dekoration > Zubehör für Fahnen & Windsäcke: Fahnen- & Windsackspitzen; Flaggen- und Windsackleinen und -seile; Beleuchtung für Fahnen- & Windsackstangen; Befestigungsvorrichtungen & -sets für Fahnen- & Windsackstangen; Stangen für Fahnen & Windsäcke
cs: Dům a zahrada > Bytové doplňky a dekorace > Prapory a větrné rukávy – příslušenství: Hlavice na prapory a větrné rukávy; Zdviže a lana pro vlajky a větrné rukávy; Osvětlení k praporům a větrným rukávům; Sady pro montáž stožárů na vlajky a větrné rukávy; Stožáry k praporům a větrným rukávům
th: บ้านและสวน > ของประดับตกแต่ง > อุปกรณ์ธงและถุงลมรูปกรวย: หัวเสาธงและหัวเสาถุงลมรูปกรวย; เชือกและสายสำหรับชักธงและถุงลมรูปกรวย; ไฟสำหรับเสาธงและถุงลมรูปกรวย; ชุดและฮาร์ดแวร์ที่ติดตั้งเสาธงและถุงลมรูปกรวย; เสาธงและถุงลมรูปกรวย
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Dekorácie > Príslušenstvo pre vlajky a veterné rukávy: Ozdoby na vlajky a veterné rukávy; Povrazy a laná pre vlajky a veterné rukávy; Tyčové osvetlenie pre vlajky a veterné rukávy; Náradie a súpravy na montáž vlajok a veterných rukávov; Tyče pre vlajky a veterné rukávy
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Acessórios para bandeiras e birutas: Pináculos para bandeiras e birutas; Adriças e cordas para bandeiras e birutas; Postes de luz para bandeiras e birutas; Kits e equipamentos para montagem de mastros para bandeiras e birutas; Postes para bandeiras e birutas
vi: Nhà và vườn > Trang trí > Phụ kiện cờ: Đầu Cắm Cờ & Cờ Gió; Dây & Ròng Rọc Cờ & Cờ Gió; Đèn cột cờ; Bộ dụng cụ và vật liệu cứng để treo cờ và cọc ống gió; Cột cờ
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Dekoras > Vėliavų ir vėjarodžių priedai: Vėliavų ir vėjarodžių stiebai; Vėliavų ir vėjarodžių lynai bei virvės; Vėliavų ir vėjarodžių stiebų žibintai; Vėliavų ir vėjarodžių stiebų tvirtinimo įranga ir rinkiniai; Vėliavų ir vėjarodžių stiebai
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 裝飾用品 > 旗幟/風向袋配件: 旗桿頂飾; 旗幟與風向袋升降索與繩索; 旗桿/風向袋桿照明燈; 旗竿架安裝配件; 旗桿/風向袋桿
da: Hjem og have > Indretning > Tilbehør til flag og vindposer: Flag- og vindposetoppe; Flag- og vindposefald og -reb; Lys til flagstænger; Monteringsbeslag og monteringssæt til flagstænger og stænger med vindposer; Flagstænger
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > インテリア・エクステリア > 旗・吹流し関連用品: 旗・吹流し用金具; 旗・吹流し用ハリヤード・ロープ; 旗・吹流しポール用照明; 旗・吹流しポール用器具; 旗・吹流し用ポール
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Koristeet > Lippujen ja viirien lisätarvikkeet: Liput ja tuulipussin kiinnikkeet; Lippu- ja tuulipussiköydet ja -narut; Lipputankovalaisimet; Lipputangon asennusvälineet ja setit; Lipputangot
sv: Hem och trädgård > Dekor > Flagg- och vindstrutstillbehör: Kulor för flaggstänger och vindstrutar; Fall och rep för flaggor och vindstrutar; Lampor till flagg- och vindstrutsstänger; Monteringsdelar och -satser för flagg- och vindstrutsstänger; Flagg- och vindstrutsstänger
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Decorațiuni > Accesorii pentru steaguri și mâneci de vânt: Vârfuri decorative pentru steaguri și mâneci de vânt; Corzi și frânghii pentru steaguri și mâneci de vânt; Indicatoare luminoase pentru stâlpi pentru steaguri și mâneci de vânt; Elemente de feronerie și seturi pentru montaj stâlpi pentru steaguri și mâneci de vânt; Stâlpi pentru steaguri și mâneci de vânt
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Acessórios de bandeiras e birutas: Terminais para bandeiras e birutas; Cabos e cordas para bandeiras e birutas; Iluminação de bandeiras e postes de birutas; Kits e equipamento de montagem de bandeiras e postes de birutas; Bandeiras e postes de birutas
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Декорация > Аксесоари за знамена и ветропоказатели: Върхове за знамена и ветропоказатели; Въжета и фалове за флагове и ветропоказатели; Светлини за стълбове за знамена и ветропоказатели; Комплекти и оборудване за монтаж на стълбове за знамена и ветропоказатели; Стълбове за знамена и ветропоказатели